California statutes. Education Code
The governing board of any school district shall expend the library fund, together with the money that is added thereto by donation, in the purchase of school apparatus and books for a school library, including books for supplementary work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

18171.

No warrant shall be drawn by the superintendent of schools upon the order of any governing board of any school district against the library fund of any district unless the order is accompanied by an itemized bill, showing the books and apparatus, and the price of each in payment of which the order is drawn, and unless the books and apparatus, except in the case of library books and apparatus purchased by a district employing a district superintendent of schools or a school librarian for full time, have been adopted by the county, city, or city and county board of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 170.)
-------------------------------------------

18172.

All orders of the governing board of any school district for books or apparatus shall in every case be submitted to the superintendent of schools of the county, city, or city and county, respectively, for his or her approval, before the books or apparatus shall be purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 171.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. California Classroom Library Materials Act of 1999 [18202. - 18203.]

18202.

(a) A fund is hereby established in the State Treasury to be known as the Business Organizations and Opportunities for Kids Fund. Moneys donated by private entities for the purchase of classroom reading materials pursuant to this article shall be deposited into this fund. These donations shall be tax exempt and treated as a charitable contribution to the extent allowed under both federal and state law.

(b) All moneys in the Business Organizations and Opportunities for Kids Fund are available for expenditure only upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or other act. The fund shall be administered by the State Librarian in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The allocation and expenditure of money in the fund shall be consistent with Section 18203.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 19.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18203.

(a) Funds appropriated for the purposes of this article shall be apportioned to eligible school districts in an equal amount per enrollment reported in the second principal apportionment of the prior fiscal year for kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 4, inclusive. Upon receiving an apportionment, a school district shall allocate these funds to each schoolsite that maintains a kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 4, inclusive. The schoolsite shall expend the funds for the purchase of grade-level appropriate reading materials in accordance with the districtwide kindergarten and grade 1 to grade 4, inclusive, classroom library plan required by Section 18201.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “grade-level appropriate reading materials” means nontextbook fiction and nonfiction books and periodicals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 19.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Unified School Districts and Union High School Districts Public Libraries [18300. - 18571.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [18300. - 18301.]

18300.

“Trustees,” or “library trustees” as used in this chapter mean the regularly elected union high school trustees who reside within the library district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18301.

“Library,” “library district,” or “library districts” as used in this chapter mean “union high school library district.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Unified School Districts [18310. - 18312.]

18310.

For the purposes of this chapter a unified school district has all of the powers and duties of a union high school district. A library district may be formed upon the application of 50 or more taxpayers and residents of any unified district, and after an election, in the manner prescribed by this chapter for the formation of a library district upon the application of taxpayers and residents of a union high school district. If the requisite number of votes cast at the election are in favor of a unified school district library district the board of supervisors shall by resolution establish the library district and place the district in the control of the governing board of the unified school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18311.

As used in this chapter the words “union high school district” mean union high school district or unified school district and the words “union high school” mean union high school or unified school district. Whenever the provisions of this chapter are being exercised by, or are being made applicable in, a unified school district, the words “union high school district” and “union high school” shall be deemed to mean unified school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18312.

If there are formed substantially within the territory of a union high school library district two or more unified school districts, the library district shall become a unified school district library district which shall be governed by the governing board of the unified school district whose territory includes the largest portion of the territory of the library district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Establishment [18320. - 18322.]

18320.

Any union high school district may establish, equip, and maintain a public library for the dissemination of knowledge of the arts, sciences, and general literature, in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18321.

The title to all property acquired for the purposes of the library, when not inconsistent with the terms of its acquisition, or not otherwise designated, vests in the district in which the library is, or is to be, situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18322.

Every union high school library established under this chapter shall be forever free to the inhabitants and nonresident taxpayers of the library district, subject always to such rules, regulations, and bylaws as may be made by the board of library trustees. For violations of any rule, regulation, or bylaw a person may be fined or excluded from the privileges of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Formation of District [18330. - 18343.]

18330.

Upon the application by petition of 50 or more taxpayers and residents of any union high school district to the board of supervisors in the county in which the union high school district is located, for the formation of a library district, and setting forth the boundaries of the proposed district, the board of supervisors shall, within 10 days after receiving the petition, by resolution, order that an election be held in the proposed district for the determination of the question and shall conduct the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

18333.

The election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of this state, where applicable, without reference to form of ballot or manner of voting. The ballot shall contain the words “Shall the Union High School Library District be established?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposal. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 4.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18335.

The election officers shall report the result of the election to the board of supervisors within five days subsequent to the holding thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18336.

If two-thirds of the votes cast at the election are in favor of a union high school library district, the board of supervisors shall, by resolution, establish the library district, and place the district in the control of the governing board of the union high school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18337.

If more than one-third of the votes cast in the election is against a library district, the board of supervisors shall, by order, so declare and no other proceedings shall be taken in relation thereto until the expiration of one year from the date of presentation of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18338.

The fact of the presentation of the petition and the order establishing the library district shall be entered on the minutes of the board of supervisors, and shall be conclusive evidence of the due presentation of a proper petition, and that each of the petitioners was, at the time of signature and presentation of the petition a taxpayer and resident of the proposed district, and of the fact and regularity of all prior proceedings of every kind and nature provided for by this article, and of the existence and validity of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18339.

Every library district shall be designated by the name and style of “____ Library District (using the name of the district) of ____ County (using the name of the county in which the district is situated).” The governing board of library trustees may select a name which sufficiently distinguishes the library district from an existing school district. A number shall not be used as a part of the designation of any library district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 27, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18340.

In the name of the library district, the governing board may sue and be sued, and may hold and convey property for the use and benefit of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18341.

The trustees in whose control the library district has been placed shall severally hold office during the term for which they have been elected as trustees of the union high school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18342.

(a) The Board of Trustees of the Santa Paula Union High School District in Ventura County may, by resolution, provide that the Santa Paula Union High School Public Library District shall be governed by a separate board of trustees. Upon adoption, the resolution shall be filed with the County Clerk of the County of Ventura. The effective date of the resolution shall not be earlier than January 1, 1996.

(b) Upon the effective date of the resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), the name of the Santa Paula Union High School Public Library District shall be the Blanchard/Santa Paula Library District.

(c) The governing board shall consist of five members, each of whom shall be a registered voter residing within the library district.

(d) Except for the initial board, members appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), and members described in subdivision (h), of the governing board shall hold office for a fixed term of four years, beginning on the last Friday in November next succeeding their appointment or election.

(e) Within 60 days after filing with the County Clerk of the County of Ventura of the resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), the Board of Supervisors of the County of Ventura shall appoint the initial governing board of the library district. The appointments shall be made from the membership of the Library Commission of the Santa Paula Union High School Public Library District.

(f) The first board of trustee shall, at their first meeting, so classify themselves by lot that their terms shall expire:

(1) Two on the last Friday in November of the first even-numbered calendar year succeeding his or her appointment.

(2) Three on the last Friday of November of the second succeeding even-numbered calendar year.

(g) The district shall continue to receive revenues, including apportioned property taxes and authorized special taxes as if it were still the Santa Paula Union High School Public Library District. There shall be no change in district powers or responsibilities.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, those persons elected to the board of trustees in 1997 shall hold office for a fixed five-year term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18343.

(a) The governing board of the Banning Unified School District may, by resolution, provide that the Banning Unified School District Library District shall be governed by a separate governing board. Upon adoption, the resolution shall be filed with the County Clerk of the County of Riverside.

(b) Upon the effective date of the resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), the name of the Banning Unified School District Library District shall be the Banning Library District.

(c) The governing board shall consist of five members, each of whom shall be a registered voter residing within the library district.

(d) Except for the initial board, members appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), and members described in subdivision (h), of the governing board shall hold office for a fixed term of four years, beginning on the last Friday in November next succeeding their appointment or election.

(e) Within 60 days after filing with the County Clerk of the County of Riverside of the resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), the Board of Supervisors of the County of Riverside shall appoint the initial governing board of the library district. The appointments shall be made from the membership of the Library Commission of the Banning Unified School District Library District.

(f) The first board of trustees shall, at their first meeting, so classify themselves by lot that their terms shall expire:

(1) Two on the last Friday in November of the first even-numbered calendar year succeeding his or her appointment.

(2) Three on the last Friday of November of the second succeeding even-numbered calendar year.

(g) The library district shall continue to receive revenues, including apportioned property taxes and authorized special taxes as if it were still the Banning Unified School District Library District. There shall be no change in district powers or responsibilities.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, those persons elected to the governing board in 2007 shall hold office for a fixed five-year term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Dissolution of Districts [18370. - 18373.]

18370.

The district may at any time be dissolved if two-thirds of the votes cast at an election called by the library trustees upon the question of dissolution are in favor of the dissolution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18371.

The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as other elections of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18372.

Upon dissolution, the property of the district shall vest in any union high school district in which the library is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18373.

If at the time of the election to dissolve the district, there is any outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district, the vote to dissolve the district shall dissolve it for all purposes excepting only the levy and collection of taxes for the payment of the indebtedness. From the time the district is dissolved until the bonded indebtedness, with the interest thereon, is fully paid, satisfied, and discharged, the board of supervisors is ex officio the library board of the district. The board shall levy such taxes and perform such other acts as are necessary in order to raise money for the payment of the indebtedness and the interest thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Meetings of Boards of Trustees [18380. - 18385.]

18380.

A board of library trustees shall meet at least quarterly, at the time and place that it may fix by resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 579, Sec. 4.   Effective October 4, 1995.   Operative January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18381.

Special meetings may be called at any time by two trustees, by written notices served upon each member at least 12 hours before the time specified for the meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18382.

Three members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18383.

The board shall hold an annual organizational meeting. In a year in which a regular election for board members is conducted, the meeting shall be held on a day within a 15-day period that commences with the date upon which a board member elected at that election takes office. Organizational meetings in years in which no such regular election for board members is conducted shall be held during the same 15-day period on the calendar. At each of such meetings, the board shall elect one of its number president, and another one of its number secretary. They shall serve as such for one year or until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

18384.

The board shall cause a proper record of its proceedings to be kept.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18385.

At the first meeting of the board of trustees of any library district formed under this chapter it shall immediately cause to be made out and filed with the State Librarian a certificate showing that the library has been established, with the date thereof, the names of the trustees, and the officers of the board chosen for the current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Powers of Boards of Trustees [18400. - 18411.]

18400.

The board of library trustees shall make and enforce all rules, regulations, and bylaws necessary for the administration, government, and protection of the library under its management, and all property belonging to the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18401.

The board of library trustees shall administer any trust declared or created for the library and receive by gift, devise, or bequest, and hold in trust or otherwise, property situated in this state or elsewhere, and where not otherwise provided, dispose of the property for the benefit of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18402.

The board of library trustees shall prescribe the duties and powers of the librarian, secretary, and other officers and employees of the library, determine the number of and appoint all officers and employees, and fix their compensation. The officers and employees shall hold their offices and positions at the pleasure of the boards.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18403.

The board of library trustees shall purchase necessary books, journals, publications, and other personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18404.

The board of library trustees shall purchase such real property, and erect or rent and equip such buildings or rooms, as in its judgment are necessary to properly carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18405.

The board of library trustees may request the appropriate state officials to furnish the library with copies of any and all reports, laws, and other publications of the state not otherwise disposed of by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18406.

The board of library trustees shall borrow books from, lend books to, and exchange books with other libraries, and shall allow nonresidents to borrow books upon such conditions as it may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18407.

The board of library trustees shall do and perform any and all other acts and things necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18408.

The board of library trustees shall file through the librarian on or before the last day in August of each year, a report with the State Librarian at Sacramento, giving the condition of its library and the number of volumes contained therein on the 30th day of June preceding. The report shall, in addition to other matters deemed expedient by the board of trustees or the district librarian, contain such statistical and other information as is deemed desirable by the State Librarian. For this purpose the State Librarian may send to the several district librarians instructions or question blanks so as to obtain the material for a comparative study of library conditions in the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18409.

The board of library trustees shall designate the hours during which the library will be open for the use of the public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18410.

All public libraries established under this chapter shall be open for the use of the public at all reasonable times.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18411.

Boards of library trustees and the boards of trustees of neighboring library districts, or the legislative bodies of neighboring municipalities, or boards of supervisors of the counties in which public libraries are situated, may contract to lend the books of the libraries to residents of the counties, neighboring municipalities, or library districts, upon a reasonable compensation to be paid by the counties, neighboring municipalities, or library districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Library Commission [18440. - 18452.]

18440.

A board of library trustees may appoint, by resolution or other order entered in the minutes of the board of library trustees, a library commission consisting of five members to manage and operate the library or libraries of the district. Before any board of library trustees appoints a library commission as provided herein, the board of library trustees shall hold at least one public hearing on the matter of the creation of a library commission; notice of such hearing shall be given by publication pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, in a newspaper designated by the board of library trustees and circulated throughout the district, and by posting of the notice in three public places in the district at least 15 days prior to the date of the public hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18441.

The members of the library commission shall hold office for three years from the first day of July next succeeding their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified, and shall serve without compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18442.

The members of the first commission appointed shall be so classified by the board of library trustees at the time of their appointment that the term of office of one of the members shall expire on the first day of July one year after the first day of July next succeeding his appointment, two at the end of one additional year thereafter, and two at the end of two additional years thereafter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18443.

Vacancies shall be filled by the board of library trustees by appointment for the unexpired term.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18444.

Within 30 days after the members of the commission are first appointed, and whenever vacancies in an office occur and are filled, the commission shall meet and organize as a commission, electing a president and a secretary from their number, after which they may transact business. The commission shall meet at a time and place that the commission determines by resolution. Regular and special meetings shall be called and conducted as prescribed in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18445.

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18446.

The commission shall act only by resolution or motion. A majority vote of the members of the commission is required on each action taken, and the vote thereon shall be recorded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18447.

The commission shall cause a proper record of its proceedings to be kept and maintained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18448.

Members of the commission may be allowed actual necessary traveling and incidental expenses incurred in the performance of official business of the district as approved by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18449.

The commission shall do and perform any and all powers and duties authorized or required of the board of library trustees in Article 7 (commencing with Section 18400) of this chapter with the exception of Section 18411, provided that the consent of the board of library trustees shall be necessary before the commission may dispose of property pursuant to Section 18401 and before the purchase, erection, rental, and equipment of buildings or rooms pursuant to Section 18404.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18450.

Upon the receipt by the county auditor of an order of the library commission of the district, he shall issue his warrant upon the county treasurer for the amount stated in the order if sufficient funds be on deposit in the account of the district with the county treasurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18451.

Annually, and on or before the first day of June of each and every year, the commission shall submit or cause to be submitted to the board of library trustees its proposed budget for the operating and maintaining of the library or libraries of the district for the ensuing fiscal year. The proposed budget shall include an estimate of the cost of any or all of the following:

(a) Leasing of temporary quarters;

(b) Purchasing of suitable real property;

(c) Procuring plans and specifications, and erecting a suitable building or buildings;

(d) Furnishing and equipping the library building, and fencing and ornamenting the grounds for the accommodation of the public library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18452.

The board of library trustees may dissolve the library commission created under the provisions of this article effective as of the 30th day of June next succeeding. Before taking action to dissolve a library commission, the board of library trustees shall hold at least one public hearing on the matter; notice of such hearing shall be given by publication pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, in a newspaper designated by the board of library trustees and circulated throughout the district, and by posting of the notice in three public places in the district at least 15 days prior to the date of the public hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Estimates of Funds Needed [18480. - 18480.]

18480.

In any library district formed under this chapter which maintains a public library, or which has petitioned for and has been granted permission to establish, and intends to maintain, a public library in accordance with this chapter, the board of library trustees shall furnish to the board of supervisors of the county in which the library district is situated, each and every year, on or before the first day of September, an estimate of the cost of any or all of the following:

(a) Leasing temporary quarters.

(b) Purchasing a suitable lot.

(c) Procuring plans and specifications and erecting a suitable building.

(d) Furnishing and equipping the building, and fencing and ornamenting the grounds for the accommodation of the public library.

(e) Conducting and maintaining the library for the ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Tax Levy [18493. - 18494.]

18493.

The revenue derived from the tax, together with all money acquired by gift, devise, bequest, or otherwise for the purposes of the library, shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the library fund of the district in which the tax was collected, subject only to the order of the library trustees of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18494.

If the payment into the treasury is inconsistent with the terms or conditions of any gift, devise, or bequest, the board of library trustees shall provide for the safety and preservation of the fund, and the application thereof to the use of the library, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the gift, devise, or bequest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Claims [18500. - 18500.]

18500.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Election for Issuance of Bonds [18510. - 18518.]

18510.

The board of trustees of any union high school library district may, when in its judgment it is deemed advisable, and shall upon a petition of 50 or more taxpayers and residents of the library district, call an election and submit to the electors of the district the proposition of whether the bonds of the district shall be issued and sold for the purpose of raising money for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) The purchase of suitable lots.

(b) Procuring plans and specifications and erecting a suitable building.

(c) Furnishing and equipping the building and fencing and ornamenting the grounds, for the accommodation of the union high school library.

(d) Any or all of the purposes of this chapter.

(e) Liquidating any indebtedness incurred for the purposes.

(f) Refunding any outstanding valid indebtedness evidenced by bonds or warrants of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18511.

In determining the amount of bonds to be issued and sold, the board of trustees may include:

(a) Legal or other fees incidental to or connected with the authorization, issuance and sale of the bonds.

(b) The costs of printing the bonds and other costs and expenses incidental to or connected with the authorization, issuance and sale of the bonds.

If such a determination is made, the proceeds of the sale of the bonds may be used to pay such costs and fees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18513.

Voting shall be by ballot, without reference to the general election law in regard to form of ballot or manner of voting. The ballots shall have printed on them the words “Shall the measure (stating the nature thereof) be adopted?” To the right or below the statement of the measure to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the measure. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 5.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18515.

If it appears that two-thirds of the votes cast at the election are in favor of issuing the bonds, the board shall cause an entry of the fact to be made upon its minutes and shall certify to the board of supervisors of the county all the proceedings had in the premises.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18518.

No error, irregularity, or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the taxpayers within the district or the electors voting at any election at which bonds of any district are authorized to be issued shall invalidate the election or any bonds authorized by such election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Issuance and Sale of Bonds [18530. - 18536.]

18530.

After the provisions of Sections 18510 to 18515, inclusive, have been complied with, the board of supervisors shall issue the bonds of the district, to the number and amount provided in the proceedings, payable out of the building fund of the district, naming it, and the money shall be raised by taxation upon the taxable property in the district, for the redemption of the bonds and the payment of the interest thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18531.

The total amount of bonds issued, shall not exceed 5 percent of the taxable property of the district, as shown by the last equalized assessment book of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18532.

The bonds shall not bear a rate of interest greater than 8 percent, payable annually or semiannually.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18533.

The board of supervisors by an order entered upon its minutes shall prescribe the form of the bonds and of the interest coupons attached thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18534.

The board of supervisors by an order entered upon its minutes shall fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal of the bonds will be payable, which shall not be more than 40 years from the date thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18534.3.

The board of supervisors may divide the principal amount of any issue into two or more series and fix different dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of one series may be made payable at different times from those of any other series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

18534.5.

The board of supervisors may provide for redemption of bonds before maturity at prices determined by it. A bond shall not be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

18535.

The bonds shall be sold in the manner prescribed by the board of supervisors, but for not less than 95 percent of par.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

18536.

The proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the building fund of the library district, and shall be drawn out for the purposes for which the bonds were issued as other library money is drawn out.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Cancellation of Bonds [18550. - 18553.]

18550.

Whenever any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter remain unsold for the period of six months after having been offered for sale in the manner prescribed by the board of supervisors, the board of trustees of the library district for or on account of which the bonds were issued, or of any library district composed wholly or partly of territory which, at the time of holding the election authorizing the issuance of the bonds, was embraced within the district for or on account of which the bonds were issued, may petition the board of supervisors to cause the unsold bonds to be withdrawn from market and canceled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18551.

Upon receiving the petition, signed by a majority of the members of the board of trustees, the supervisors shall fix a time for hearing the petition, which shall not be more than 30 days thereafter, and shall cause a notice, stating the time and place of hearing, and the object of the petition in general terms, to be published for 10 days prior to the day of hearing in a newspaper published in the library district, if there is one, and if there is no newspaper published in the library district, then in a newspaper published at the county seat of the county in which the library district or part thereof is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18552.
